District of Columbia statutes.
41-203

Destruction of released instruments.

When a financing statement filed pursuant to part 4 of Article 9 of Subtitle I of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code has not lapsed, but all the collateral described in the financing statement has been released in the manner provided by part 4 thereof, the Recorder of Deeds may, after the expiration of 3 years from the date of the filing of the statement releasing all the collateral, destroy the financing statement and each continuation statement, statement of assignment, and statement of release relating thereto.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 546-F
June 5, 1952, 66 Stat. 126, ch. 370, § 3
Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 773, Pub. L. 88-243, § 12
1981 Ed., § 42-103.
1973 Ed., § 42-106.